Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.510

Duties of weighmaster.

A licensed public weighmaster shall: (1) Keep the scale or scales upon which he or she weighs any commodity or thing, in conformity with the standards of weights and measures; (2) carefully and correctly weigh and certify the gross, tare, and net weights of any load of any commodity or thing required to be weighed; and (3) without charge, weigh any commodity or thing brought to his or her scale by the director or peace officer, and issue a certificate of the weights thereof.

[ 2017 c 158 s 7; 2010 c 8 s 6107; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 22.]